California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) The identification card required by this section shall be issued by a health insurer to an insured upon commencement of coverage or upon a change in the insured’s coverage that impacts the data content or format of the card.

(c) This section does not require a health insurer to issue a separate identification card for professional mental health coverage if the insurer issues a card for health care coverage in general and the card provides the information required by this section.

(d) If a health insurer, as described in subdivision (a), delegates responsibility for issuing the card to a contractor or agent, the contractor or agent shall be required to comply with this section.

(e) This section does not prohibit a health insurer from meeting the standards of the Workgroup for Electronic Data Interchange (WEDI) or other national uniform standards with respect to identification cards, and a health insurer shall be deemed compliant with this section if the insurer conforms with these
 standards, as long as the minimum requirements described in subdivision (a) have been
 met.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “identification card” includes other technology that performs substantially the same function as an identification card.

(g) (1) This section shall not apply to Medicare supplement insurance, employee assistance programs, CHAMPUS supplement insurance, or TRI-CARE supplement insurance, or to hospital indemnity, accident-only, and specified disease insurance. This section shall also not apply to specialized health insurance policies, except behavioral health-only policies.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), this section shall not apply to a behavioral health-only policy that provides coverage for professional mental health services pursuant to a contract with a health care service plan or insurer if that plan or insurer issues an identification card to its subscribers or insureds pursuant to this section or Section 1367.29 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 687, Sec. 9.   (SB 910)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.199.

(a) A health insurer that provides coverage for professional mental health services shall establish an Internet Web site. Each Internet Web site shall include, or provide a link to, the following information:

(1) A telephone number that the insured or provider can call, during normal business hours, for assistance obtaining mental health benefits coverage information, including the extent to which benefits have been exhausted, in-network provider access information, and claims processing information.

(2) A link to prescription drug formularies posted pursuant to Section 10123.192, or instructions on how to obtain
 formulary information.

(3) A detailed summary description of the process by which the insurer reviews and approves, modifies, or denies requests for health care services as described in Section 10123.135.

(4) Lists of providers or instructions on how to obtain a provider list as required by Section 10133.1.

(5) A detailed summary of the health insurer’s grievance process.

(6) A detailed description of how the insured may request continuity of care as described in Section 10133.55.

(7) Information concerning the right, and applicable procedure, of the insured to request an independent medical review
 pursuant to Section 10169.

(b) Except as otherwise specified, the material described in subdivision (a) shall be updated at least quarterly.

(c) The information described in subdivision (a) may be made available through a secured Internet Web site that is only accessible to the insured.

(d) The material described in subdivision (a) shall also be made available to insureds in hard copy upon request.

(e) This article does not preclude an insurer from including additional information on its Internet Web site for applicants or insureds, including, but not limited to, the cost of procedures or services by health care providers in an insurer’s network.

(f) The department shall include on the department’s Internet Web site, a link to the Internet Web site of each health insurer described in subdivision (a).

(g) This section shall not apply to Medicare supplement insurance, employee assistance programs, CHAMPUS supplement insurance, or TRI-CARE supplement insurance, or to hospital indemnity, accident-only, and specified disease insurance. This section shall also not apply to specialized health insurance policies, except behavioral health-only policies.

(h) This
 section shall not apply to a health insurer that contracts with a specialized health care service plan, insurer, or other entity to cover professional mental health services for its insureds, provided that the health insurer provides a link on its Internet Web site to an Internet Web site operated by the specialized health care service plan, insurer, or other entity with which it contracts, and that plan, insurer, or other entity complies with this section or Section 1368.016 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 687, Sec. 10.   (SB 910)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.1991.

(a) (1) A health insurer shall provide to insureds a written or electronic notice regarding the benefits of a behavioral health and wellness screening for children and adolescents 8 to 18 years of age.

(2) “Behavioral health and wellness screening” means a screening, test, or assessment to identify indicators or symptoms of behavioral health issues in an individual, including, but not limited to, depression or anxiety.

(b) The notice shall provide information regarding the benefits of behavioral health and wellness screenings for both depression and anxiety.

(c) A health insurer shall provide notice pursuant to
 this section annually.

(d) This section does not apply to Medi-Cal managed care that contracts with the State Department of Health Care Services entered into pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of, or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of, Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 10.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.20.

(a) A health insurance policy that is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed on or after July 1, 2000, shall be deemed to provide coverage for all generally medically accepted cancer screening tests, subject to all other terms and conditions that would otherwise apply.

(b) A health insurance policy that is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed on or after July 1, 2022, shall not require prior authorization for either of the following:

(1) Biomarker testing for an insured with advanced or metastatic stage 3 or 4 cancer.

(2) Biomarker testing of cancer progression or recurrence in the insured with advanced or metastatic stage 3 or 4 cancer.

(c) For purposes of this section, “biomarker test” means a diagnostic test, such as single or multigene, of the cancer patient’s biospecimen, such as tissue, blood, or other bodily fluids, for DNA or RNA alterations, including phenotypic characteristics of a malignancy, to identify an individual with a subtype of cancer, in order to guide patient treatment.

(d) This section shall not apply to vision-only, dental-only, accident-only, specified disease,
 hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, long-term care, or disability income insurance, except that for accident-only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity insurance, coverage for benefits under this section shall apply to the extent that the benefits are covered under the general terms and conditions that apply to all other benefits under the policy or contract. This section shall not be construed as imposing a new benefit mandate on accident-only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity insurance.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), this section does not prohibit a health insurer from requiring prior authorization on biomarker testing that is not for an FDA-approved therapy for advanced or metastatic stage 3 or 4 cancer.

(f) This section does not limit, prohibit, or
 modify an insured’s rights to biomarker testing as part of an approved clinical trial under Section 10145.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 605, Sec. 2.   (SB 535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.201.

(a) A policy of health insurance that covers outpatient prescription drugs shall cover medically necessary drugs. The policy may provide for step therapy and prior authorization consistent with Section 1342.7 of the Health and Safety Code and any regulations adopted pursuant to that section.

(b) (1) Commencing January 1, 2017, an insurer shall maintain a pharmacy and therapeutics committee that shall be responsible for developing, maintaining, and overseeing any drug formulary list. If the insurer delegates responsibility for the formulary to any entity, the obligation of the insurer to comply with this part shall not be waived.

(2) The pharmacy and therapeutics committee board membership shall conform with both of the following:

(A) Represent a sufficient number of clinical specialties to adequately meet the needs of insureds.

(B) Consist of a majority of individuals who are practicing physicians, practicing pharmacists, and other practicing health professionals who are licensed to prescribe drugs.

(3) Members of the board shall abstain from voting on any issue in which the member has a conflict of interest with respect to the issuer or a pharmaceutical manufacturer.

(4) At least 20 percent of the board membership shall not have a
 conflict of interest with respect to the issuer or any pharmaceutical manufacturer.

(5) The pharmacy and therapeutics committee shall meet at least quarterly and shall maintain written documentation of the rationale for its decisions regarding the development of, or revisions to, the formulary drug list.

(6) The pharmacy and therapeutics committee shall do all of the following:

(A) Develop and document procedures to ensure appropriate drug review and inclusion.

(B) Base clinical decisions on the strength of the scientific evidence and standards of practice, including assessing peer-reviewed medical literature, pharmacoeconomic studies, outcomes
 research data, and other related information.

(C) Consider the therapeutic advantages of drugs in terms of safety and efficacy when selecting formulary drugs.

(D) Review policies that guide exceptions and other utilization management processes, including drug utilization review, quantity limits, and therapeutic interchange.

(E) Evaluate and analyze treatment protocols and procedures related to the insurer’s formulary at least annually.

(F) Review and approve all clinical prior authorization criteria, step therapy protocols, and quantity limit restrictions applied to each covered drug.

(G) Review new United
 States Food and Drug Administration-approved drugs and new uses for existing drugs.

(H) Ensure the insurer’s formulary drug list or lists cover a range of drugs across a broad distribution of therapeutic categories and classes and recommended drug treatment regimens that treat all disease states and does not discourage enrollment by any group of insureds.

(I) Ensure the insurer’s formulary drug list or lists provide appropriate access to drugs that are included in broadly accepted treatment guidelines and that are indicative of general best practices at the time.

(7) This subdivision shall be interpreted consistent with federal guidance issued under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 156.122 of Title 45 of
 the Code of Federal Regulations. This subdivision shall apply to the individual, small group, and large group markets.

(c) (1) A health insurer may impose prior authorization requirements on prescription drug benefits, consistent with the requirements of this part.

(2) (A) If there is more than one drug that is clinically appropriate for the treatment of a medical condition, a health insurer may require step therapy.

(B) A health insurer shall expeditiously grant a request for a step therapy exception within the applicable time limit required by Section 10123.191 if a prescribing provider submits necessary justification and supporting clinical documentation supporting the provider’s
 determination that the required prescription drug is inconsistent with good professional practice for provision of medically necessary covered services to the insured, taking into consideration the insured’s needs and medical history, along with the professional judgment of the insured’s provider. The basis of the provider’s determination may include, but is not limited to, any of the following criteria:

(i) The required prescription drug is contraindicated or is likely, or expected, to cause an adverse reaction or physical or mental harm to the insured in comparison to the requested prescription drug, based on the known clinical characteristics of the insured and the known characteristics and history of the insured’s prescription drug regimen.

(ii) The required prescription drug
 is expected to be ineffective based on the known clinical characteristics of the insured and the known characteristics and history of the insured’s prescription drug regimen.

(iii) The insured has tried the required prescription drug while covered by their current or previous health coverage or Medicaid, and that prescription drug was discontinued due to lack of efficacy or effectiveness, diminished effect, or an adverse reaction. The health insurer may require the submission of documentation demonstrating that the insured tried the required prescription drug before it was discontinued.

(iv) The required prescription drug is not clinically appropriate for the insured because the required drug is expected to do any of the following, as determined by the insured’s prescribing
 provider:

(I) Worsen a comorbid condition.

(II) Decrease the capacity to maintain a reasonable functional ability in performing daily activities.

(III) Pose a significant barrier to adherence to, or compliance with, the insured’s drug regimen or plan of care.

(v) The insured is stable on a prescription drug selected by the insured’s prescribing provider for the medical condition under consideration while covered by their current or previous health coverage or Medicaid.

(C) (i) This section does not prohibit a health care provider from prescribing a prescription drug that is clinically appropriate.

(ii) This section does not prohibit an insurer or utilization review organization from requiring an insured to try an AB-rated generic equivalent, biosimilar,
 as defined in Section 262(i)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or interchangeable biological product, as defined in Section 262(i)(3) of Title 42 of the United States Code, before providing coverage for the equivalent branded prescription drug.

(iii) Clause (ii) does not prohibit or supersede a step therapy exception request as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(3) An insurer shall provide coverage for the medically necessary dosage and quantity of the drug prescribed for the treatment of a medical condition consistent with professionally recognized standards of practice.

(4) For plan years commencing on or after January 1, 2017, an insurer that provides essential health benefits shall allow an insured to access prescription drug benefits at an in-network retail pharmacy unless the prescription drug is subject to restricted distribution by the United States Food and Drug Administration or requires special handling, provider coordination, or patient education that cannot be provided by a retail pharmacy. A nongrandfathered individual or small group health insurer may charge an insured a different cost sharing for obtaining a covered drug at a retail pharmacy, but all cost sharing shall count
 toward the policy’s annual limitation on cost sharing consistent with Section 10112.28.

(d) A health care provider or prescribing provider may file an internal appeal of a denial of an exception request for coverage of a nonformulary drug, prior authorization request, or step therapy exception request consistent with the health insurer’s current utilization management processes.

(e) An insured or the insured’s designee or guardian may appeal a denial of an exception request for coverage of a nonformulary drug, prior authorization request, or step therapy exception request by filing an internal appeal with the health insurer pursuant to Section 2719 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-19) and any subsequent rules or regulations issued thereunder.

(f) Every health insurer that provides prescription drug benefits shall maintain all of the following information, which shall be made available to the commissioner upon request:

(1) The complete drug formulary or formularies of the insurer, if the insurer maintains a formulary, including a list of the prescription drugs on the formulary of the insurer by major therapeutic category with an indication of whether any drugs are preferred over other drugs.

(2) Records developed by the pharmacy and therapeutics committee of the insurer, or by others responsible for developing, modifying, and overseeing formularies, including medical groups, individual practice associations, and contracting pharmaceutical benefit
 management companies, used to guide the drugs prescribed for the insureds of the insurer, that fully describe the reasoning behind formulary decisions.

(3) Any insurer arrangements with prescribing providers, medical groups, individual practice associations, pharmacists, contracting pharmaceutical benefit management companies, or other entities that are associated with activities of the insurer to encourage formulary compliance or otherwise manage prescription drug benefits.

(g) If an insurer provides prescription drug benefits, the commissioner shall, as part of its market conduct examination, review the performance of the insurer in providing those benefits, including, but not limited to, a review of the procedures and information maintained pursuant to this section, and describe
 the performance of the insurer as part of its report issued as part of its market conduct examination.

(h) The commissioner shall not publicly disclose any information reviewed pursuant to this section that is determined by the commissioner to be confidential pursuant to state law.

(i) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Authorization” means approval by the health insurer to provide payment for the prescription drug.

(2) “Step therapy” means a type of protocol that specifies the sequence in which different prescription drugs for a given medical condition and medically appropriate for a particular patient are to be
 prescribed.

(3) “Step therapy exception” means a decision to override a generally applicable step therapy protocol in favor of coverage of the prescription drug prescribed by a health care provider for an individual insured.

(4) “Utilization review organization” means an entity that conducts utilization review, other than a health insurer performing its own utilization review.

(j) Nonformulary prescription drugs shall include any drug for which an insured’s copayment or out-of-pocket costs are different than the copayment for a formulary prescription drug, except as otherwise provided by law or regulation.

(k) This section does not affect an insured’s or
 policyholder’s eligibility to submit a complaint to the department for review or to apply to the department for an independent medical review under Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 10169).

(l) This section does not restrict or impair the application of any other provision of this part.

(m) This section and Section 10123.191 apply to both the health insurer and a utilization review organization that performs utilization review or utilization management functions on the insurer’s behalf. Commencing January 1, 2022, a contract between a health insurer and a utilization review organization that performs utilization review or utilization management functions on the insurer’s behalf shall include terms that require the utilization review organization to comply with this section
 and Section 10123.191.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 495, Sec. 2.   (SB 621)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.202.

(a) A health insurance policy issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2017, excluding specialized health insurance policies, shall be prohibited from requiring an insured to receive a referral before receiving coverage or services for reproductive and sexual health care.

(b) (1) For the purposes of this section, “reproductive and sexual health care services” are all reproductive and sexual health services described in Sections 6925, 6926, 6927, and 6928 of the Family Code, or Section 121020 of the Health and Safety Code, obtained by a patient.

(2) This section applies
 whether or not the patient is a minor.

(c) In implementing this section, a health insurer may establish reasonable provisions governing utilization protocols for obtaining reproductive and sexual health care services, as provided for in subdivision (a), if these provisions are consistent with the intent of this section and are those customarily applied to other health care providers, such as primary care physicians and surgeons, to whom the insured has direct access, and are not more restrictive for reproductive and sexual health care services. An insured shall not be required to obtain prior approval from another physician, another provider, or the insurer before obtaining direct access to reproductive and sexual health care services. An insurer may establish reasonable provisions governing communication with the insured’s primary
 care physician and surgeon regarding the insured’s condition, treatment, and a need for followup care.

(d) This section shall not apply to a health insurance policy that does not require insureds to obtain a referral from their primary care physician before seeking covered health care services from a specialist.

(e) A health insurer shall not impose utilization protocols related to contraceptive drugs, supplies, and devices beyond
 those in Section 10123.196.

(f) This section shall not apply to specialized health insurance, Medicare supplement insurance, CHAMPUS supplement insurance, or TRICARE supplement insurance, or to hospital indemnity, accident-only, or specified disease insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 687, Sec. 11.   (SB 910)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.203.

Commencing January 1, 2019, an insurer shall prorate an insured’s cost sharing for a partial fill of a prescription dispensed pursuant to Section 4052.10 of the Business and Professions Code. This section shall only apply to oral, solid dosage forms of prescription drugs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 615, Sec. 6.   (AB 1048)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.204.

(a) A health insurance policy issued, amended, delivered, or renewed on or after July 1, 2023, that provides prescription drug benefits and maintains one or more drug formularies shall do all of the following:

(1) Upon request of an insured or an insured’s prescribing provider, furnish all of the following information regarding a prescription drug to the insured or the insured’s prescribing health care provider:

(A) The insured’s
 eligibility for the prescription drug.

(B) The most current formulary or formularies.

(C) Cost-sharing information for the prescription drug and other formulary alternatives, consistent with cost-sharing requirements as set forth in the policy and accurate at the time it is provided, including any variance in cost sharing based on the patient’s preferred dispensing pharmacy, whether retail or mail order, or the health care provider.

(D) Applicable utilization management requirements for the prescription drug and other formulary alternatives.

(2) Respond in real time to a
 request made pursuant to paragraph (1) through a standard API.

(3) Allow the use of an interoperability element to provide the information required pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) Ensure that the information provided pursuant to paragraph (1) is current no later than one business day after a change is made and is provided in real time.

(5) Provide the information pursuant to paragraph (1) if the request is made using the drug’s unique billing code and National Drug Code.

(b) A health insurer shall not do any of the following:

(1) Deny or delay a response to a request for the purpose of blocking
 the release of information pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Restrict, prohibit, or otherwise hinder a prescribing provider from communicating or sharing to an insured any of the following:

(A) The information provided pursuant to subdivision (a).

(B) Additional information on any lower cost or clinically appropriate alternative drugs, whether or not they are covered under the insured’s health insurance policy.

(C) Information about the cash price of the drug.

(3) Except as required by law, interfere with, prevent, or materially discourage access, exchange, or use of the information provided pursuant to
 subdivision (a). “Interfere with, prevent, or materially discourage access, exchange, or use of the information” includes charging fees for access to the information, not responding to a request at the time made consistent with this section, or instituting insured consent requirements.

(4) Penalize a prescribing provider for disclosing the information provided pursuant to subdivision (a). For purposes of this paragraph, “penalize” includes an action intended to punish a provider for disclosing the information set forth in subdivision (a) or intended to discourage a provider from disclosing this information in the future.

(5) Penalize a prescribing provider for prescribing, administering, or ordering a lower cost or clinically appropriate alternative drug. For purposes of
 this paragraph, “penalize” includes an action intended to punish a provider who has prescribed, administered, or ordered a lower cost or clinically appropriate alternative drug, or intended to discourage a provider from prescribing, administering, or ordering a lower cost or clinically appropriate alternative drug in the future.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Cost sharing” includes applicable copayments, coinsurances, or deductibles.

(2) “Cost-sharing information” means the actual out-of-pocket amount an insured would be required to pay a dispensing pharmacy or prescribing provider for a prescription drug under the terms of the insured’s health insurance policy. 

(3) “Formulary” has the same meaning as in Section 10123.192.

(4) “Interoperability element” means integrated technologies or services necessary to provide a response to an insured or an insured’s prescribing provider.

(5) “Prescribing provider” is a health care provider authorized to write a prescription to treat a medical condition, including prescriptions to treat mental health and substance use disorders, for an insured.

(6) “Standard API” means an application interface that is
 standardized for vendors to conform to in order to access the information pursuant to Section 170.215 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) (1) This section does not authorize further disclosure inconsistent with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) (Public Law 104-191) and the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code).

(2) This section does not alter or interfere with requirements that a health insurer cover prescription drugs consistent with this chapter and regulations promulgated thereunder.

(3) This section does not alter or interfere with a health
 insurer’s other obligations under this article, including requirements to disclose or explain its prescription drug benefit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 590, Sec. 2.   (AB 2352)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.2045.

(a) A health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, that provides prescription drug coverage shall not calculate an insured’s cost sharing at an amount that exceeds the actual rate paid by the insurer for the prescription drug. Cost sharing shall include deductibles and coinsurance.

(b) To the extent that a health insurance policy with a pharmacy benefit manager issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, includes disclosure of the net price paid by the pharmacy benefit manager or group purchasing organization, then an insured’s cost sharing shall not be calculated at an amount that exceeds that net price
 paid.

(c) (1) Commencing January 1, 2026, if a preexisting contract between a pharmacy benefit manager licensed pursuant to Article 6.1 (commencing with Section 1385.001) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and a health insurer authorizes spread pricing, as that term is defined by Section 1385.001 of the Health and Safety Code, any subsequent amendment or renewal of that contract shall not authorize spread pricing.

(2) A contract that is executed on or after January 1, 2026, between a pharmacy benefit manager licensed pursuant to Article 6.1 (commencing with Section 1385.001) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and a health insurer shall not authorize spread pricing, as that term is defined by Section 1385.001
 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 605, Sec. 16.   (SB 41)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.205.

(a) (1) A health insurer that reports rate information pursuant to Section 10181.3 or 10181.45 shall report the information described in paragraph (2) to the department no later than October 1 of each year, beginning October 1, 2018.

(2) For all covered prescription drugs, including generic drugs, brand name drugs, and specialty drugs dispensed at a plan pharmacy, network pharmacy, or mail order pharmacy for outpatient use, all of the following shall be reported:

(A) The 25 most frequently prescribed drugs.

(B) The 25 most
 costly drugs by total annual plan spending.

(C) The 25 drugs with the highest year-over-year increase in total annual plan spending.

(b) The department shall compile the information reported pursuant to subdivision (a) into a report for the public and legislators that demonstrates the overall impact of drug costs on health care premiums. The data in the report shall be aggregated and shall not reveal information specific to individual health insurers.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a “specialty drug” is one that
 exceeds the threshold for a specialty drug under the Medicare Part D program (Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 (Public Law 108-173)).

(d) By January 1 of each year, beginning January 1, 2018, the department shall publish on its Internet Web site the report required pursuant to subdivision (b).

(e) After the report required in subdivision (b) is released, the department shall include the report as part of the public meeting required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10181.45.

(f) Except for the report required pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall keep confidential all of the information provided to the department pursuant to this section, and the information shall be
 protected from public disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 603, Sec. 5.   (SB 17)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.206.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, an individual or group health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2015, that provides coverage for prescribed, orally administered anticancer medications used to kill or slow the growth of cancerous cells shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Notwithstanding any
 deductible, the total amount of copayments and coinsurance an insured is required to pay shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for an individual prescription of up to a 30-day supply of a prescribed orally administered anticancer medication covered by the policy.

(2) For a health insurance policy that meets the definition of a “high deductible health plan” set forth in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, paragraph (1) shall only apply once an insured’s deductible has been satisfied for the year.

(3) An orally administered anticancer medication shall be provided consistent with the appropriate standard of care for that medication.

(b) This section shall not apply to a specialized health insurance policy that covers only dental or vision benefits or any coverage under a health insurance policy for the Medicare Program
 pursuant to Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 607, Sec. 2.   (SB 421)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.207.

(a) Every health insurance policy, except a specialized health insurance policy, that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2022, shall provide coverage without cost sharing for a colorectal cancer screening test assigned either a grade of A or a grade of B by the United States Preventive Services Task Force. The required colonoscopy for a positive result on a test or procedure, other than a colonoscopy, that is a colorectal cancer screening examination or laboratory test identified assigned either a grade of A or a grade of B by the United States Preventive Services Task Force shall also be provided without any cost sharing.

(b) This section does not preclude a health insurer that has a network of providers from imposing cost-sharing requirements for the items or services described in this section that are delivered by an out-of-network provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 436, Sec. 2.   (AB 342)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.208.

(a) A health insurance policy issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2022, excluding specialized health insurance policies, shall provide coverage for home test kits for sexually transmitted diseases (STD), including any laboratory costs of processing the kit, that are deemed medically necessary or appropriate and ordered directly by an in-network clinician, or furnished through a standing order for patient use based on clinical guidelines and
 individual patient health needs.

(b) For purposes of this section, “home test kit” means a product used for a test recommended by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention guidelines or the United States Preventive Services Task Force that has been CLIA-waived, FDA-cleared or -approved, or developed by a laboratory in accordance with established regulations and quality standards, to allow individuals to self-collect specimens for STDs, including HIV, remotely at a location outside of a clinical setting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 486, Sec. 7.   (SB 306)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.209.

(a) A health insurance policy that is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed on or after July 1, 2024, shall include coverage for medically necessary biomarker testing, subject to utilization review management, pursuant to this section. Biomarker testing shall be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an insured’s disease or condition to guide treatment decisions. Coverage shall include biomarker tests that meet any of the following:

(1) A
 labeled indication for a test that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) or is an indicated test for an FDA-approved drug.

(2) A national coverage determination made by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(3) A local coverage determination made by a Medicare Administrative Contractor for California.

(4) Evidence-based clinical practice guidelines, supported by peer-reviewed literature and peer-reviewed scientific studies published in or accepted for publication by medical journals that meet nationally recognized requirements for scientific manuscripts and that submit most of their published articles for review by experts who are not part of the editorial staff.

(5) Standards set by the National Academy of Medicine.

(b) A health insurer shall use the process described in subdivision (f) of Section 10123.135 to determine whether biomarker testing is medically necessary for purposes of this section.

(c) A health insurance policy that is subject to this
 section shall ensure that biomarker testing is provided in a manner that limits disruptions in care, including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. This section shall not be construed to require coverage of biomarker testing for screening purposes unless otherwise required by this part.

(d) Restricted or denied use of biomarker testing for the purpose of diagnosis, treatment, or ongoing monitoring of any medical condition is subject to grievance and appeal processes under state and federal law, including Section 2719 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-19) and any regulations subsequently adopted thereunder, and the Independent Medical Review System under Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 10169).

(e) For purposes of this
 section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacological responses to a specific therapeutic intervention. A biomarker includes, but is not limited to, gene mutations or protein expression.

(2) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of an individual’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for the presence of a biomarker. Biomarker testing includes, but is not limited to, single-analyte tests, multiplex panel tests, and whole genome sequencing.

(f) This section is subject to the provisions of Section 10123.20 as amended by Chapter 605 of the Statutes of 2021 for an insured with
 advanced or metastatic stage III or IV cancer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 401, Sec. 2.   (SB 496)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.210.

(a) A health insurer that provides health coverage to the employees of a religious employer that does not include coverage and benefits for both abortion and contraception shall provide, in writing upon initial enrollment and annually thereafter upon renewal, each insured with information regarding both of the following:

(1) Abortion and contraception benefits or services that are not included in the insured’s health insurance policy.

(2) Abortion and contraception benefits or services that may be available at no cost through the California Reproductive Health Equity Program.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Abortion” has the same meaning as defined in Section 123464 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “California Reproductive Health Equity Program” means the program established pursuant to Section 127632 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Contraception” means the services and contraceptive methods described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10123.196.
